Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Oil and Gas Conservation
353.564.
When owner or prior owner deemed to have waived certain rights — Cabinet’s authority to recover actual and necessary expenses incurred in implementing KRS 353.561 to 353.564 — Cabinet’s power when seeking cost-efficiency or public benefit — Administrative regulations.

Any prior owner or the surface owner shall be deemed to have waived any right to any equipment or product remaining at the site of an orphan well or abandoned storage tank facility at the time of plugging, removal, or reclamation by the cabinet or its contractors pursuant to this section or KRS

353.561

,

353.562

, or

353.563

because of the abandonment or neglect of the facility being plugged, removed, or reclaimed with public moneys from the Kentucky abandoned storage tank and orphan well reclamation fund established in KRS

353.562

.

Pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, the cabinet or its agents may include as part of the plugging, removal, reclamation or remediation contract all equipment or products removed from that orphan well or abandoned storage tank facility for sale, recycling, or disposal.

The cabinet shall have the authority to recover actual and necessary expenditures, including administrative costs, reasonably incurred in carrying out the duties of this section and KRS

353.561

,

353.562

, and

353.563

from:

The last owner or operator of record of the abandoned storage tank facility where fund moneys were expended; and

Any other party legally responsible for causing or contributing to a threat to human health, safety, and the environment that the Commonwealth incurred as costs or expenses under this section and KRS

353.561

,

353.562

, and

353.563

.

The cabinet may initiate an action for reimbursement of costs in any court of competent jurisdiction. The recovery of any costs under this section and KRS

353.563

shall be credited to the Kentucky abandoned storage tank and orphan well reclamation fund except for recovered administrative costs which shall be retained by the cabinet.

The cabinet may not seek reimbursement from the landowner for costs incurred under this section and KRS

353.563

unless the landowner qualifies as the last known owner or operator under subsection (2)(a) of this section or caused or contributed to a threat under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

Expenditures of moneys from the fund for the purposes established in KRS 353.562(5) and (6) shall be prioritized in the following order:

Eligible wells and abandoned storage tank facilities that are an imminent threat to human health, safety, or the environment;

Abandoned storage tank facilities and orphan wells that could pose a threat to human health, safety, or the environment as evidenced by the proximity to structures, streams, rivers, water bodies, or other sensitive areas; and

Abandoned storage tank facilities and orphan wells that could pose a potential threat to human health, safety, or the environment.

The cabinet may address any abandoned storage tank facility or eligible well, regardless of priority, if doing so would be cost-efficient or otherwise create a demonstrable benefit for the public at large.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A in order to provide further detail related to the ranking of wells and abandoned storage tank facilities for plugging, removal, remediation, and reclamation.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 21, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 21, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

353.565.
Kentucky Oil and Gas Conservation Commission.

There is hereby created in the Department for Natural Resources, the “Kentucky Oil and Gas Conservation Commission” which shall be composed of five (5) members. Four (4) of the members shall be appointed by the Governor and the fifth member, who shall serve as chairman of the commission, shall be the director of the Division of Oil and Gas and who shall serve in an ex officio capacity as a nonvoting member except in the case of a tie. The four (4) members appointed by the Governor shall be residents of this state and not more than one (1) of them may be directly employed in the exploration for or the production of oil or gas, or deriving more than fifty percent (50%) of that person’s income from the exploration for or production of oil or gas, or engaged in a business directly servicing or supplying these activities. No member of the commission shall participate in the deliberations of the commission or vote on any matter before the commission in which he, his employer, or any business unit in which he has a financial interest is an interested party, but a member of the commission is not prohibited from deliberating or voting on matters of general interest, such as the fixing of statewide spacing patterns, affecting him, his employer, or a business unit in which he has financial interest as a member of a class of persons to be affected by an administrative regulation or order of the commission. The commission shall not contain more than one (1) representative from any one (1) operator, including subsidiaries or affiliates. Of the four (4) members appointed by the Governor, two (2) shall be residents of eastern Kentucky and two (2) shall be residents of western Kentucky. Longitude 84 deg. 30 min. shall be deemed as the division line between eastern Kentucky and western Kentucky.

The members of the commission, except the chairman, shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years each, except that:

The original appointments shall be for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), and four (4) years respectively; and

Of the members appointed after July 15, 1998, one (1) member appointed to fill the term expiring June 21, 1999, shall serve until January 21, 2000; one (1) member appointed to fill the term expiring June 21, 2000, shall serve until January 21, 2001; one (1) member appointed to fill one (1) of the two (2) terms expiring June 21, 2001, shall serve until January 21, 2002; and one (1) member appointed to fill the second of the two (2) terms expiring June 21, 2001, shall serve until January 21, 2003; and subsequent appointments shall be for four (4) year terms ending on January 21. Each member appointed by the Governor shall serve until his successor has been appointed and qualified. Members may be reappointed by the Governor to serve successive terms. The members of the commission, before performing any duty hereunder, shall take an oath which shall be certified by the officer administering it. The oath in writing and the certificate shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. Vacancies in the membership appointed by the Governor shall be filled by appointment by him and for the unexpired term of the member whose office shall be vacant, and the appointment shall be made by the Governor within sixty (60) days of the occurrence of a vacancy. Any member appointed by the Governor may be removed by the Governor in case of incompetency, neglect of duty, gross immorality, or malfeasance of office.

The commission shall meet at times and places as shall be designated by the chairman. The chairman may call a meeting of the commission at any time, and he shall call a meeting of the commission upon the written request of two (2) members. Notification of each meeting shall be given in writing to each member by the chairman at least five (5) days in advance of the meeting. Any three (3) members, one (1) of which may be the chairman, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, including the holding of hearings. A majority of the commission present shall be required to determine any issue brought before it for decision.

Each member of the commission, except the chairman, shall receive one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per diem not to exceed one hundred (100) days per calendar year while actually engaged in the performance of his duties as a member of the commission. Each member of the commission, including the chairman, shall also be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of his duties as a member of the commission.

The commission shall execute and carry out, administer, and enforce the provisions of KRS

353.651

and

353.652

. The commission may make any investigation of records and facilities as it deems proper.

If an emergency is found to exist by the commission which, in its judgment, requires the making, changing, renewal, or extension of an administrative regulation or order without first having a hearing, an emergency regulation may be promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A and an emergency order may be issued in accordance with KRS

13B.125

.

The commission shall have specific authority to:

Promulgate and enforce reasonable administrative regulations and issue orders reasonably necessary to prevent waste, protect correlative rights, govern the practice and procedure before the commission, and otherwise administer the provisions of KRS

353.651

and

353.652

; and

Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for the production of any books, records, maps, charts, diagrams, and other pertinent documents, and administer oaths and affirmations to witnesses, whenever, in the judgment of the commission, it is necessary to do so for the effective discharge of its duties under the provisions of KRS

353.651

and

353.652

.

Any interested person may have the commission call a hearing for the purpose of taking action in respect to any matter within the jurisdiction of the commission by making a request therefor in writing. Upon the receipt of any request, the commission promptly shall call a hearing thereon, and, after the hearing and with all convenient speed, and in any event within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of the hearing, shall take appropriate action with regard to the subject matter thereof as it may deem appropriate. If the hearing is adjudicatory in nature, it shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Agreements made in the interest of conservation of oil or gas, or both, or for the prevention of waste, between and among owners or operators, or both, owning separate holdings in the same field or pool, or in any area that appears from geologic or other data to be underlaid by a common accumulation of oil or gas, or both, and agreements between and among these owners or operators, or both, and royalty owners therein, for the purpose of bringing about the development and operation of the field, pool, or area, or any part thereof, as a unit, and for establishing and carrying out a plan for the cooperative development and operation thereof, when the agreements are approved by the commission, are hereby authorized and shall not be held or construed to violate any of the laws of this state relating to trusts, monopolies, or contracts and combinations in restraint of trade.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as giving to the commission the right or authority to supersede the authority of the department in the administration of KRS

353.060

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 45, § 3; 1978, ch. 154, § 39, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 145, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 318, § 340, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 194, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1906, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A request for a hearing under this section by an interested person seeking to unitize a shallow well pool under this section must be granted since this section is not limited to deep well pool unitization.

OAG 80-305

.

353.570.
Permit required — Department may authorize operation prior to issuance of permit.

No person shall drill or deepen a well, drill a stratigraphic test well, or reopen a plugged well for the production of oil or gas or for the injection of water, gas or other fluid into any oil or gas producing formation (except seismograph test holes) after June 16, 1960, or drill or deepen a water supply well after June 16, 1966, until such person shall obtain a permit from the department, except as provided in KRS

353.588

.

When any applicant for a permit as required by this section has complied with the provisions of this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, the department shall issue the permit.

The department may authorize the commencement of the drilling, deepening or reopening of any well prior to the issuance of a permit therefor; except if the location of the well is known to be underlaid by a coal-bearing stratum and consent of the owner, operator, and lessee of the coal-bearing stratum has not been granted. Consent shall be implied, when the coal-bearing stratum is owned by the oil and gas lessor or lessee, and the coal is not under lease to any third party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 9; 1966, ch. 147, § 1; 1998, ch. 359, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2016 ch. 40, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 21, § 13, effective June 27, 2019.

353.572.
Eligibility requirements for permit issuance or transfer under this chapter — When operator ineligible to receive a permit or become a successor operator, factors considered — Energy and Environment Cabinet to promulgate administrative regulations relating to compliance with eligibility requirements — Restoration of eligibility for applicants, operators, and control persons.

The cabinet shall not issue a permit, or approve an application to transfer a well or wells to a successor operator pursuant to KRS 353.590(23), and an operator shall not be eligible to receive any permits or become a successor operator under this chapter, if:

The applicant has falsified or otherwise misrepresented any information on or relating to the permit application;

The applicant has failed to abate or reach an agreement with the cabinet regarding an unappealed violation of KRS

353.500

to

353.720

or the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;

A control person of the applicant has a forfeiture of a bond;

The applicant is a control person for another operator that has a forfeiture of a bond;

A control person for the applicant served as a control person for another operator when an unresolved bond forfeiture occurred; or

The applicant is or has a control person who controls or is controlled by another operator that has a forfeiture of a bond.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to allow for the proper administration of the compliance review described in this section. The cabinet shall restore eligibility for applicants, operators, and control persons who are deemed permit-ineligible pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section upon the resubmission of the application correcting the false or misrepresented information. The cabinet shall restore eligibility for applicants, operators, or control persons who are deemed permit-ineligible pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section upon satisfactory abatement of the violation, including payment of any civil penalties. The cabinet shall restore eligibility for applicants, operators, or control persons who are deemed permit-ineligible pursuant to subsection (1)(c) to (f) of this section upon entry and satisfactory compliance of an agreed order between the operator and the cabinet that resolves all of the operator’s outstanding violations, requires payment of any civil penalties, and provides restitution to the cabinet for any costs associated with the forfeiture, plugging, and proper abandonment of a well in excess of the bonded amount.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 21, § 11, effective June 27, 2019.

353.575.
Duty of applicant to meet and confer with permittee if drilling will disturb permitted area.

Prior to the issuance of a permit to drill an oil or gas well on land which is permitted or bonded under the provisions of KRS Chapter 350, the applicant shall certify that he has met and conferred with, or offered to meet and confer with, the permittee as to any activity that will disturb the permitted area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 348, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

353.580.
Expiration of permit — Extensions.

Each permit issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

shall expire one (1) year after the date issued, unless the drilling, deepening, or reopening of a well is commenced pursuant thereto prior to the expiration of the one (1) year period. However, the permit term shall be extended by one (1) year if, prior to the expiration date, the permit applicant notifies the department in writing of the applicant’s request for an extension, notifies the owner, record coal lessee, or mine licensee originally entitled to receive a copy of the plat under KRS

353.050

, submits an affidavit stating that the information in the original permit application is still correct, and submits a fee for the extension in an amount equal to the permit fee required by KRS

353.590

. With respect to permits issued prior to July 15, 2002, no extension shall be granted for any permit in cases where there has been a complete severance of the ownership of the oil and gas from the ownership of the surface to be disturbed, unless the requested extension is agreed to in writing by the surface owner.

The extension of the permit term pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall not create a right to object to the well location under KRS

353.060

nor to mediation under KRS

353.5901

.

All permits issued by the department under any previous statute shall continue in force as written, only if the drilling of the well has been commenced pursuant thereto on or before sixty (60) days after June 16, 1960.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 10; 2002, ch. 325, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 150, § 10, effective June 24, 2003.

353.588.
Investigation of abandoned wells — Application — Report — Bond.

Any person may investigate an abandoned well upon receipt of approval from the department. The person shall submit to the department:

An application requesting approval to investigate and stating the planned methods for the investigation. In all cases where there has been a complete severance of the ownership of the oil and gas from the ownership of the surface to be disturbed, the application shall include a plan to prevent erosion and sedimentation;

A twenty-five dollar ($25) fee; and

A certification by the applicant that he has the authority to enter the property upon which the well is located and to conduct the investigation.

The department shall review all applications for investigation. If the department approves the request for investigation, the applicant shall be allowed to produce the well without a permit as required by KRS

353.570

, and the applicant shall submit a report of investigation to the department on forms provided by the department. In order to produce the well for more than sixty (60) days, the applicant must obtain a bond as required by KRS 353.590(7) or (12). Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 353.590(2), no fee shall be required for any such well.

HISTORY:

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2019, ch. 21, § 12, effective June 27, 2015.